West Virginia, session 2026, HB4223.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 21, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-2D-4 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (exemption of Certificate of Need, 65 CSR 29), is authorized.